Wyoming, session 2025, HB0116.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-7-143 is created to read:
31-7-143. Unauthorized aliens; invalid out-of-state
driver's licenses and nonresident operating privileges.
(a) Any driver's license or nonresident operating
privilege document issued by a jurisdiction outside Wyoming
to an unauthorized alien or any driver's license or
nonresident operating privilege document that is
substantially similar to a driver's license or driving
operating privilege card that has markings establishing
that the license or card holder did not provide proof of
lawful presence in the United States shall be deemed
invalid as a driver's license or operating privilege
document under the laws of this state.
(b) As used in this section, "unauthorized alien"
means a person who is not a United States citizen and is
not lawfully admitted in the United States.
Section 2. W.S. 31-7-107(a)(i) through (iii) and (v)
and 31-7-134(a) are amended to read:
31-7-107. Persons exempted.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0116
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) The following persons are exempt from the
licensing requirement under this act:
(i) Any employee of the United States government
while operating a motor vehicle owned by or leased to the
United States government and being operated on official
business unless the employee is required by the United
States government or any agency thereof to have a state
driver's license and the state driver's license is not
invalid under W.S. 31-7-143(a);
(ii) A nonresident who has in his immediate
possession a valid license issued to him by the licensing
authority in his place of residence, if the nonresident's
license is not invalid under W.S. 31-7-143(a) or the
nonresident can demonstrate lawful presence in the United
States;
(iii) A nonresident on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States who has a valid license issued
by his state of residence and the nonresident's spouse or
dependent son or daughter who has a valid license issued by
the person's state of residence, if the nonresident's
license is not invalid under W.S. 31-7-143(a);
(v) A nonresident full-time student at the
University of Wyoming, a Wyoming community college, a
school licensed in this state offering post-secondary
education or at a parochial, church or religious school as
defined by W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iv) offering post secondary
post-secondary education, who has in his immediate
possession a valid license issued to him by the licensing
authority of his place of residence, if the nonresident's
license is not invalid under W.S. 31-7-143(a);
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0116
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
31-7-134. Driving while license cancelled, suspended,
invalid or revoked.
(a) No person shall drive a motor vehicle on any
public highway in this state at a time when his driver's
license, from this or any other jurisdiction, or
nonresident operating privileges are cancelled, suspended,
deemed invalid or revoked under this act or any other law.
Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a
person convicted of violating this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven
hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not
more than six (6) months, or both.
Section 3. The department of transportation shall
promulgate any rules necessary to implement this act.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0116
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4